Missouri, session 2026, HB2146.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 96.192, 96.196, 195.417, 206.110, and
579.060, RSMo, are repealed and seven new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 96.192, 96.196, 195.417,
206.110, 206.158, 376.417, and 579.060, to read as follows:
96.192. 1. The board of trustees of any hospital
authorized under subsection 2 of this section, and
established and organized under the provisions of sections
96.150 to 96.229, may invest up to [twenty-five] fifty
percent of [the hospital's] its funds not required for
immediate disbursement in obligations or for the operation
of the hospital [in any United States investment grade fixed
income funds or any diversified stock funds, or both] into:
(1) Any mutual funds that invest in stocks, bonds, or
real estate, or any combination thereof;
(2) Bonds that have:
(a) One of the five highest long-term ratings or the
highest short-term rating issued by a nationally recognized
rating agency; and
(b) A final maturity of ten years or less;
(3) Money-market investments; or
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SCS HB 2146 2
(4) Any combination of investments described in
subdivisions (1) to (3) of this subsection.
The board shall invest the remaining percentage of funds not
required for immediate disbursement into any investment in
which the state treasurer is allowed to invest.
2. The provisions of this section shall only apply if
the hospital:
(1) Receives less than [one] three percent of its
annual revenues from municipal, county, or state taxes; and
(2) Receives less than [one] three percent of its
annual revenue from appropriated funds from the municipality
in which such hospital is located.
96.196. 1. A hospital organized under this chapter
may purchase, operate or lease, as lessor or lessee, related
facilities or engage in health care activities, except in
counties of the third or fourth classification (other than
the county in which the hospital is located) where there
already exists a hospital organized pursuant to this chapter
[and chapter 205 or 206]; provided, however, that this
exception shall not prohibit the continuation of existing
activities otherwise allowed by law.
2. If a hospital organized pursuant to this chapter
accepts appropriated funds from the city during the twelve
months immediately preceding the date that the hospital
purchases, operates or leases its first related facility
outside the city boundaries or engages in its first health
care activity outside the city boundaries, the governing
body of the city shall approve the hospital's plan for such
purchase, operation or lease prior to implementation of the
plan.

SCS HB 2146 3
195.417. 1. The limits specified in this section
shall not apply to any quantity of such product, mixture, or
preparation which must be dispensed, sold, or distributed in
a pharmacy pursuant to a valid prescription.
2. Within any thirty-day period, no person shall sell,
dispense, or otherwise provide to the same individual, and
no person shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire more
than the following amount: any number of packages of any
drug product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers,
either as:
(1) The sole active ingredient; or
(2) One of the active ingredients of a combination
drug; or
(3) A combination of any of the products specified in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection;
in any total amount greater than seven and two-tenths grams,
without regard to the number of transactions.
3. Within any twenty-four-hour period, no pharmacist,
intern pharmacist, or registered pharmacy technician shall
sell, dispense, or otherwise provide to the same individual,
and no person shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire
more than the following amount: any number of packages of
any drug product containing any detectable amount of
ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any
of their salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical
isomers, either as:
(1) The sole active ingredient; or
(2) One of the active ingredients of a combination
drug; or

SCS HB 2146 4
(3) A combination of any of the products specified in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection;
in any total amount greater than three and six-tenths grams
without regard to the number of transactions.
4. Within any twelve-month period, no person shall
sell, dispense, or otherwise provide to the same individual,
and no person shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire
more than the following amount: any number of packages of
any drug product containing any detectable amount of
ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any
of their salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical
isomers, either as:
(1) The sole active ingredient; or
(2) One of the active ingredients of a combination
drug; or
(3) A combination of any of the products specified in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection;
in any total amount greater than [forty-three] sixty-one and
two-tenths grams, without regard to the number of
transactions.
5. All packages of any compound, mixture, or
preparation containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers,
except those that are excluded from Schedule V in subsection
17 or 18 of section 195.017, shall be offered for sale only
from behind a pharmacy counter where the public is not
permitted, and only by a registered pharmacist or registered
pharmacy technician under section 195.017.

SCS HB 2146 5
6. Each pharmacy shall submit information regarding
sales of any compound, mixture, or preparation as specified
in this section in accordance with transmission methods and
frequency established by the department by regulation.
7. (1) As used in this subsection, "administrator of
the real-time electronic pseudoephedrine tracking system"
means the entity responsible for developing, implementing,
and maintaining the data collection system described in 19
CSR 30-1.074 or any successor regulation.
(2) Beginning October 1, 2026, and continuing
thereafter, any manufacturer of any compound, mixture, or
preparation specified in this section that is sold in or
into the state shall, on a monthly basis, pay fees to the
administrator of the real-time electronic pseudoephedrine
tracking system.
(3) The administrator of the real-time electronic
pseudoephedrine tracking system shall be responsible for
setting the fee levels required under this subsection.
(4) Upon the request of the department of health and
senior services, any manufacturer required to pay fees under
this subsection shall provide written documentation
demonstrating that the manufacturer has paid such fees.
(5) The fees required under this subsection shall be
assessed against each manufacturer solely on the basis of
sales transactions involving that manufacturer's own
compounds, mixtures, or preparations sold in or into the
state. No manufacturer shall be assessed fees based upon
transactions attributable to the compounds, mixtures, or
preparations of any other manufacturer.
8. No prescription shall be required for the
dispensation, sale, or distribution of any drug product
containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,

SCS HB 2146 6
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in an
amount within the limits described in subsections 2, 3, and
4 of this section. The superintendent of the Missouri state
highway patrol shall report to the revisor of statutes and
the general assembly by February first when the statewide
number of methamphetamine laboratory seizure incidents
100 exceeds three hundred incidents in the previous calendar
101 year. The provisions of this subsection shall expire on
102 April first of the calendar year in which the revisor of
103 statutes receives such notification.
104 [8.] 9. This section shall supersede and preempt any
105 local ordinances or regulations, including any ordinances or
106 regulations enacted by any political subdivision of the
107 state. This section shall not apply to the sale of any
108 animal feed products containing ephedrine or any naturally
109 occurring or herbal ephedra or extract of ephedra.
110 [9.] 10. Any local ordinances or regulations enacted
111 by any political subdivision of the state prior to August
112 28, 2020, requiring a prescription for the dispensation,
113 sale, or distribution of any drug product containing any
114 detectable amount of ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or
115 pseudoephedrine, or any of their salts or optical isomers,
116 or salts of optical isomers, in an amount within the limits
117 described in subsections 2, 3, and 4 of this section shall
118 be void and of no effect and no such political subdivision
119 shall maintain or enforce such ordinance or regulation.
120 [10.] 11. All logs, records, documents, and electronic
121 information maintained for the dispensing of these products
122 shall be open for inspection and copying by municipal,
123 county, and state or federal law enforcement officers whose

SCS HB 2146 7
124 duty it is to enforce the controlled substances laws of this
125 state or the United States.
126 [11.] 12. All persons who dispense or offer for sale
127 pseudoephedrine and ephedrine products, except those that
128 are excluded from Schedule V in subsection 17 or 18 of
129 section 195.017, shall ensure that all such products are
130 located only behind a pharmacy counter where the public is
131 not permitted.
132 [12.] 13. The penalty for a knowing or reckless
133 violation of this section is found in section 579.060.
206.110. 1. A hospital district, both within and
outside such district, except in counties of the third or
fourth classification (other than within the district
boundaries) where there already exists a hospital organized
pursuant to [chapters 96, 205 or] this chapter; provided,
however, that this exception shall not prohibit the
continuation or expansion of existing activities otherwise
allowed by law, shall have and exercise the following
governmental powers, and all other powers incidental,
necessary, convenient or desirable to carry out and
effectuate the express powers:
(1) To establish and maintain a hospital or hospitals
and hospital facilities, and to construct, acquire, develop,
expand, extend and improve any such hospital or hospital
facility including medical office buildings to provide
offices for rental to physicians and dentists on the
district hospital's medical or dental staff, and the
providing of sites therefor, including offstreet parking
space for motor vehicles;
(2) To acquire land in fee simple, rights in land and
easements upon, over or across land and leasehold interest
in land and tangible and intangible personal property used

SCS HB 2146 8
or useful for the location, establishment, maintenance,
development, expansion, extension or improvement of any
hospital or hospital facility. The acquisition may be by
dedication, purchase, gift, agreement, lease, use or adverse
possession or by condemnation;
(3) To operate, maintain and manage a hospital and
hospital facilities, and to make and enter into contracts,
for the use, operation or management of a hospital or
hospital facilities; to engage in health care activities;
and to make and enter into leases of equipment and real
property, a hospital or hospital facilities, as lessor or
lessee, regardless of the duration of such lease; and to
provide rules and regulations for the operation, management
or use of a hospital or hospital facilities. Any agreement
entered into pursuant to this subsection pertaining to the
lease of the hospital shall have a definite termination date
as negotiated by the parties, but this shall not preclude
the trustees from entering into a renewal of the agreement
with the same or other parties pertaining to the same or
other subjects upon such terms and conditions as the parties
may agree;
(4) To fix, charge and collect reasonable fees and
compensation for the use or occupancy of the hospital or any
part thereof, or any hospital facility, and for nursing
care, medicine, attendance, or other services furnished by
the hospital or hospital facilities, according to the rules
and regulations prescribed by the board from time to time;
(5) To borrow money and to issue bonds, notes,
certificates, or other evidences of indebtedness for the
purpose of accomplishing any of its corporate purposes,
subject to compliance with any condition or limitation set

SCS HB 2146 9
forth in this chapter or otherwise provided by the
Constitution of the state of Missouri;
(6) To employ or enter into contracts for the
employment of any person, firm, or corporation, and for
professional services, necessary or desirable for the
accomplishment of the corporate objects of the district or
the proper administration, management, protection or control
of its property;
(7) To maintain the hospital for the benefit of the
inhabitants of the area comprising the district who are
sick, injured, or maimed regardless of race, creed or color,
and to adopt such reasonable rules and regulations as may be
necessary to render the use of the hospital of the greatest
benefit to the greatest number; to exclude from the use of
the hospital all persons who willfully disregard any of the
rules and regulations so established; to extend the
privileges and use of the hospital to persons residing
outside the area of the district upon such terms and
conditions as the board of directors prescribes by its rules
and regulations;
(8) To police its property and to exercise police
powers in respect thereto or in respect to the enforcement
of any rule or regulation provided by the ordinances of the
district and to employ and commission police officers and
other qualified persons to enforce the same;
(9) To lease to or allow for any institution of higher
education to use or occupy the hospital, any real estate or
facility owned or leased by the district or any part thereof
for the purpose of health care-related and general education
or training.
2. The use of any hospital or hospital facility of a
district shall be subject to the reasonable regulation and

SCS HB 2146 10
control of the district and upon such reasonable terms and
conditions as shall be established by its board of directors.
3. A regulatory ordinance of a district adopted under
any provision of this section may provide for a suspension
or revocation of any rights or privileges within the control
of the district for a violation of any such regulatory
ordinance.
4. Nothing in this section or in other provisions of
this chapter shall be construed to authorize the district or
board to establish or enforce any regulation or rule in
respect to hospitalization or the operation or maintenance
of such hospital or any hospital facilities within its
jurisdiction which is in conflict with any federal or state
law or regulation applicable to the same subject matter.
206.158. 1. The board of trustees of any hospital
authorized under subsection 2 of this section, and
established and organized under the provisions of sections
206.010 to 206.160, may invest up to fifty percent of its
funds not required for immediate disbursement in obligations
or for the operation of the hospital into:
(1) Any mutual funds that invest in stocks, bonds, or
real estate, or any combination thereof;
(2) Bonds that have:
(a) One of the five highest long-term ratings or the
highest short-term rating issued by a nationally recognized
rating agency; and
(b) A final maturity of ten years or less;
(3) Money-market investments; or
(4) Any combination of investments described in
subdivisions (1) to (3) of this subsection.

SCS HB 2146 11
The board shall invest the remaining percentage of funds not
required for immediate disbursement into any investment in
which the state treasurer is allowed to invest.
2. The provisions of this section shall only apply if
the hospital district receives less than three percent of
its annual revenues from hospital district or state taxes.
376.417. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "340B drug", the same meaning given to the term in
section 376.414;
(2) "Covered entity", any entity described in
subparagraphs (A) to (K) of subsection (a)(4) of Section
340B of the Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. Section
256b, including any pharmacy with which such entity has
contracted to dispense 340B drugs on behalf of the entity;
(3) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the
term in section 376.1350;
(4) "Pharmacy", an entity licensed under chapter 338;
(5) "Pharmacy benefits manager", the same meaning
given to the term in section 376.388.
2. A health carrier, a pharmacy benefits manager, or
an agent or affiliate of such health carrier or pharmacy
benefits manager shall not discriminate against a covered
entity including, but not limited to, by doing any of the
following:
(1) Reimbursing a covered entity for a quantity of a
340B drug in an amount less than it would pay any other
similarly situated pharmacy or entity that is not a covered
entity for such quantity of such drug on the basis that the
covered entity is a covered entity or that the covered
entity dispenses 340B drugs. The director of the department
of commerce and insurance shall specify by rule the

SCS HB 2146 12
circumstances under which a pharmacy or entity shall be
deemed a "similarly situated pharmacy or entity" for
purposes of this subdivision;
(2) Imposing any terms or conditions on covered
entities that differ from such terms or conditions applied
to other similarly situated entities or pharmacies that are
not covered entities on the basis that the covered entity is
a covered entity or that the covered entity dispenses 340B
drugs including, but not limited to, terms or conditions
with respect to any of the following:
(a) Fees, chargebacks, clawbacks, adjustments, or
other assessments;
(b) Professional dispensing fees;
(c) Restrictions or requirements regarding
participation in standard or preferred pharmacy networks;
(d) Requirements relating to the frequency or scope of
audits or to inventory management systems using generally
accepted accounting principles; and
(e) Any other restrictions, conditions, practices, or
policies that, as specified by the director of the
department of commerce and insurance, interfere with the
ability of a covered entity to maximize the value of
discounts provided under 42 U.S.C. Section 256b;
(3) Discriminating in reimbursement to a covered
entity based on the determination or indication a drug is a
340B drug;
(4) Requiring a covered entity to identify, either
directly or through a third party, a 340B drug;
(5) Refusing to cover drugs purchased under the 340B
drug-pricing program; or

SCS HB 2146 13
(6) Requiring a covered entity to reverse, resubmit,
or clarify a 340B drug-pricing claim after the initial
adjudication unless these actions are:
(a) In the normal course of pharmacy business and not
related to 340B drug pricing; or
(b) Required by federal law.
3. The director of the department of commerce and
insurance shall impose a civil penalty on any health
carrier, pharmacy benefits manager, or agent or affiliate of
such health carrier or pharmacy benefits manager that
violates the requirements of this section. Such penalty
shall not exceed five thousand dollars per violation per day.
4. The director of the department of commerce and
insurance shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
579.060. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
sale, distribution, or purchase of over-the-counter
methamphetamine precursor drugs if he or she knowingly:
(1) Sells, distributes, dispenses, or otherwise
provides any number of packages of any drug product
containing detectable amounts of ephedrine,

SCS HB 2146 14
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in a
total amount greater than seven and two-tenths grams to the
same individual within a thirty-day period, unless the
amount is dispensed, sold, or distributed pursuant to a
valid prescription; or
(2) Purchases, receives, or otherwise acquires within
a thirty-day period any number of packages of any drug
product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers in a
total amount greater than seven and two-tenths grams,
without regard to the number of transactions, unless the
amount is purchased, received, or acquired pursuant to a
valid prescription; or
(3) Purchases, receives, or otherwise acquires within
a twenty-four-hour period any number of packages of any drug
product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers in a
total amount greater than three and six-tenths grams,
without regard to the number of transactions, unless the
amount is purchased, received, or acquired pursuant to a
valid prescription; or
(4) Sells, distributes, dispenses, or otherwise
provides any number of packages of any drug product
containing detectable amounts of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in a
total amount greater than [forty-three] sixty-one and two-
tenths grams to the same individual within a twelve-month

SCS HB 2146 15
period, unless the amount is dispensed, sold, or distributed
pursuant to a valid prescription; or
(5) Purchases, receives, or otherwise acquires within
a twelve-month period any number of packages of any drug
product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers in a
total amount greater than [forty-three] sixty-one and two-
tenths grams, without regard to the number of transactions,
unless the amount is purchased, received, or acquired
pursuant to a valid prescription; or
(6) Dispenses or offers drug products that are not
excluded from Schedule V in subsection 17 or 18 of section
195.017 and that contain detectable amounts of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, without
ensuring that such products are located behind a pharmacy
counter where the public is not permitted and that such
products are dispensed by a registered pharmacist or
pharmacy technician under subsection 11 of section 195.017;
or
(7) Holds a retail sales license issued under chapter
144 and knowingly sells or dispenses packages that do not
conform to the packaging requirements of section 195.418.
2. A pharmacist, intern pharmacist, or registered
pharmacy technician commits the offense of unlawful sale,
distribution, or purchase of over-the-counter
methamphetamine precursor drugs if he or she knowingly:
(1) Sells, distributes, dispenses, or otherwise
provides any number of packages of any drug product
containing detectable amounts of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their

SCS HB 2146 16
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in a
total amount greater than three and six-tenth grams to the
same individual within a twenty-four hour period, unless the
amount is dispensed, sold, or distributed pursuant to a
valid prescription; or
(2) Fails to submit information under subsection 13 of
section 195.017 and subsection 6 of section 195.417 about
the sales of any compound, mixture, or preparation of
products containing detectable amounts of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in
accordance with transmission methods and frequency
established by the department of health and senior services;
or
(3) Fails to implement and maintain an electronic log,
as required by subsection 12 of section 195.017, of each
transaction involving any detectable quantity of
pseudoephedrine, its salts, isomers, or salts of optical
isomers or ephedrine, its salts, optical isomers, or salts
of optical isomers; or
(4) Sells, distributes, dispenses or otherwise
provides to an individual under eighteen years of age
without a valid prescription any number of packages of any
drug product containing any detectable quantity of
pseudoephedrine, its salts, isomers, or salts of optical
isomers, or ephedrine, its salts or optical isomers, or
salts of optical isomers.
3. Any person who violates the packaging requirements
of section 195.418 and is considered the general owner or
operator of the outlet where ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
100 phenylpropanolamine products are available for sale shall
101 not be penalized if he or she documents that an employee

SCS HB 2146 17
102 training program was in place to provide the employee who
103 made the unlawful retail sale with information on the state
104 and federal regulations regarding ephedrine,
105 pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine.
106 4. A manufacturer commits the offense of unlawful
107 sale, distribution, or purchase of over-the-counter
108 methamphetamine precursor drugs if he or she knowingly fails
109 to pay the fees required under subsection 7 of section
110 195.417.
111 5. The offense of unlawful sale, distribution, or
112 purchase of over-the-counter methamphetamine precursor drugs
113 is a class A misdemeanor.
✓